Hawaii statutes.
[§663-22 Reduction of award.]
If in such action it is determined that plaintiff is entitled to recover,
defendant may introduce evidence of any advance payment made, and the court
shall reduce the award to the plaintiff to the extent that said award includes
an amount paid by any such advance payment. [L 1969, c 233, §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next